Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1297.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of July 10, 1990 (P.L.404, No.98), known as the Real Estate Appraisers Certification Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Fair Housing Act." The Fair Housing Act (Public Law 90-284, 42 U.S.C. § 3601 et seq.).1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *Section 2. Section 5 of the act is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 5. Powers and duties of board.The board shall have the following powers and duties:* * *(7.1) To submit annually a report to the Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives and the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate concerning the bias and discrimination training required under section 10.1.* * *(12) To conduct annually, in collaboration with the Department of Community and Economic Development and the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency, an audit of appraisal issues statewide. The board shall provide any recommendations included in the audit report to the Department of Community and Economic Development for inclusion in the Department of Community and Economic Development's analysis of impediments to fair housing choice.Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 10.1. Bias and discrimination training.(a) Development of training.--The board, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission, shall develop bias and discrimination training, to which the following shall apply:(1) The training may be in person or online.(2) The training shall include:(i) the history of discrimination and segregation and the role of the appraisal industry in establishing 20250HB1297PN1493 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and perpetuating discrimination and segregation;(ii) information about the costs of appraisal bias for families, communities, the housing industry and the Commonwealth, including the impact on the racial homeownership and wealth gaps;(iii) an in-depth explanation of Federal fair housing laws, including the Fair Housing Act and Federal regulations, as well as the role of State and local housing laws;(iv) recent case examples that clearly identify fact patterns representing illegal appraisal discrimination and focusing on situations that are common and clearly covered by the Fair Housing Act;(v) an explanation of how compliance with fair housing laws and standards benefits the appraisal and housing industry, consumers, communities and greater society;(vi) best practices to ensure compliance with the letter and spirit of applicable fair housing laws;(vii) instruction in cultural competency; and(viii) instruction in the elimination of bias, including implicit bias.(b) Training required.--Prior to receiving or renewing a certification or license under this act, an applicant must complete the training developed under subsection (a).Section 10.2. Prohibition of appraisal discrimination.(a) Prohibition.--A licensee or certificate holder under this act may not base, either partially or completely, an analysis or opinion of market value on any of the following related to either the present or prospective owners or occupants 20250HB1297PN1493 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the subject property or of the present owners or occupants of the properties in the vicinity of the subject property:(1) Race.(2) Color.(3) Religion.(4) Gender or gender expression.(5) Age.(6) National origin.(7) Disability.(8) Marital status.(9) Source of income.(10) Sexual orientation.(11) Familial status.(12) Employment status.(13) Military status.(14) Any other basis prohibited by section 3 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act.(b) Penalty.--(1) If the board finds that a licensee or certificate holder under this act has violated this section:(i) the discriminatory appraisal shall be void;(ii) the licensee or certificate holder shall have the license or certificate suspended;(iii) the licensee or certificate holder shall pay a fine that shall equal the cost of the discriminatory appraisal;(iv) the licensee or certificate holder must attend an anti-bias seminar approved by the board, which shall include information on existing antidiscrimination laws 20250HB1297PN1493 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and how they relate to housing and appraisals; and(v) the licensee or certificate holder shall pay a civil penalty not to exceed:(A) $10,000 for the first violation of this section;(B) $25,000 for the second violation of this section occurring within five years of the first violation; and(C) $50,000 for a third or subsequent violation that occurs within seven years of the second violation.(2) A license or certification suspended under paragraph (1)(ii) shall be restored if the licensee or certificate holder:(i) pays the fine under paragraph (1)(iii);(ii) pays the civil penalty under paragraph (1)(v); and(iii) attends the anti-bias seminar under paragraph (1)(iv).(c) Reporting.--The board shall:(1) Create a form by which property owners may report a suspected violation of subsection (a), which shall be made available on a publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Investigate each allegation reported under subparagraph (1).(d) Notice.--Prior to the initiation of a property appraisal, a licensee or certificate holder under this act shall provide a property owner or agent of the property owner with a document, given free of charge, informing the property owner or agent of the property owner of the opportunity to report to the 20250HB1297PN1493 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board any suspicion of a discriminatory appraisal by the licensee or certificate holder.Section 10.3. Disparate impact study.(a) Study.--The board shall conduct a study to identify and make recommendations for the alleviation of elements of the appraisal industry that disparately impact individuals based on race, color or ethnicity. The board shall consider:(1) qualification, examination, certification, licensure and other requirements that serve as barriers to entry to the appraisal profession for potential appraisers based on race, color or ethnicity, the business justification for those requirements and whether there are less discriminatory alternatives that can achieve the business interest;(2) how standard appraisal datasets and data collection forms may be adjusted to reduce opportunities for appraisers to apply subjective criteria;(3) how potential bias in the use of technology-based valuation tools may be addressed;(4) how coordination between agencies involved in the enforcement of and compliance with fair lending and fair housing laws may be strengthened to address appraisal discrimination;(5) how regulatory agency examination procedures of mortgage lenders may include identification of patterns of appraisal bias;(6) how information and resources relating to appraisal bias may be made more available and accessible to consumers; and(7) potential legislative solutions related to paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5) and (6).20250HB1297PN1493 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Issue report.--Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the board shall issue a report of its findings and recommendations to:(1) The Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate.(2) The Commerce Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The Community, Economic and Recreational Development Committee of the Senate.(4) The Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate.(5) The Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives.(6) The Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives.(7) The Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate.(8) The Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1297PN1493 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516171819